Hawaii statutes.
[§328-17.9] Supply of electronic
equipment. No person shall supply prescription information processing
system equipment, including computer hardware, software, facsimile machines,
and related equipment, to practitioners, pharmacists, pharmacies, or medical
oxygen distributors, on the condition, agreement, or understanding that the
recipient of the equipment shall not deal in the commodity of a competitor,
shall not deal with a competitor, or shall deal only with persons identified by
the supplier of the equipment. [L 2001, c 124, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next